Wisconsin, session 2025, SB20.
do enact as follows:SB20,11Section 1. 71.07 (9e) (ar) of the statutes is created to read:SB20,2,8271.07 (9e) (ar) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, a 3married person who lives apart from the person’s spouse when filing a separate 4return and is unable to file a joint return because of domestic abuse, as defined in s. 5968.075 (1) (a), may credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.02 an amount equal 6to one of the following percentages of the federal basic earned income credit for 7which the person would be eligible for the taxable year under section 32 of the 8Internal Revenue Code if the person were considered unmarried:SB20,2,1091. If the person has one qualifying child who has the same principal place of 10abode as the person, 4 percent.SB20,2,12112. If the person has 2 qualifying children who have the same principal place of 12abode as the person, 11 percent.SB20,2,14133. If the person has 3 or more qualifying children who have the same principal 14place of abode as the person, 34 percent.SB20,215Section 2. 71.07 (9e) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB20,2,191671.07 (9e) (b) No credit may be allowed under this subsection par. (aj) to 17married persons, except married persons living apart who are treated as single 18under section 7703 (b) of the internal revenue code, if the husband and wife report 19their income on separate income tax returns for the taxable year.SB20,2,2020